dictionaries/de_DE-1901/de_DE-1901.aff
#####################################################################################
# This is the affix file "de_DE_oldspell.aff" of the German Hunspell dictionary
# according to the rules of 1901 (i.e. classical spelling)
#
# Version: 2014-02-14
#
# Derived from the frami dictionary
# Version: 20131206 + frami20131206 (build 20131206)
#
# Copyright
# (C) 1998-2013 Bjoern Jacke <bjoern@j3e.de> 
# (C) 1998-2013 Franz Michael Baumann <fm.baumann@uni-muenster.de>
#
# Modified according to the classical spelling rules by 
# (C) 2010-2014 Rüdiger Brünner (Version: 2014-02-14)
#
# License: GPLv2, GPLv3 or OASIS distribution license agreement
# There should be a copy of both of this licenses included
# with every distribution of this dictionary. Modified
# versions using the GPL may only include the GPL
#######################################################################################


SET UTF-8
TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzäüößáéêàâñESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÄÜÖÉ-.

# un- prefix for anything 
PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un       .

# Inseparable ver- prefix for verbs 
PFX V Y 1
PFX V   0     ver      .

# IN, INNEN for feminizing nouns and NEN for xxxIN nouns 
SFX F Y 17
SFX F   0     nen        in
SFX F   e     in         e
SFX F   e     innen      e
SFX F   0     in         [^i]n
SFX F   0     innen      [^i]n
SFX F   0     in         [^enr]
SFX F   0     innen      [^enr]
SFX F   0     in         [^e]r
SFX F   0     innen      [^e]r
SFX F   0     in         [^r]er
SFX F   0     innen      [^r]er
SFX F   0     in         [^e]rer
SFX F   0     innen      [^e]rer
SFX F   0     in         ierer
SFX F   0     innen      ierer
SFX F   er    in         [^i]erer
SFX F   er    innen      [^i]erer
#SFX F   en    innen        en
#SFX F   en    Innen        en


SFX L N 12
SFX L   0       tlich      n
SFX L   0       tliche     n
SFX L   0       tlicher    n
SFX L   0       tliches    n
SFX L   0       tlichem    n
SFX L   0       tlichen    n
SFX L   0       lich       [^n]
SFX L   0       liche      [^n]
SFX L   0       licher     [^n]
SFX L   0       liches     [^n]
SFX L   0       lichem     [^n]
SFX L   0       lichen     [^n]


#SFX H N 2
#SFX H   0       heit       .
#SFX H   0       heiten     .


#SFX K N 2
#SFX K   0       keit       .
#SFX K   0       keiten     .


# CHEN/LEIN diminuitiv:  
SFX M N 22
SFX M   0       chen       [^se]
SFX M   0       chens      [^se]
SFX M   aß      äßchen     aß
SFX M   aß      äßchens    aß
SFX M   oß      ößchen     oß
SFX M   oß      ößchens    oß
SFX M   uß      üßchen     uß
SFX M   uß      üßchens    uß
SFX M   e       chen       e
SFX M   e       chens      e
SFX M   0       lein       [^sle]
SFX M   0       leins      [^sle]
SFX M   aß      äßlein     aß
SFX M   aß      äßleins    aß
SFX M   oß      ößlein     oß
SFX M   oß      ößleins    oß
SFX M   uß      üßlein     uß
SFX M   uß      üßleins    uß
SFX M   l       lein       l
SFX M   l       leins      l
SFX M   e       lein       e
SFX M   e       leins      e


SFX A Y 46
SFX A   0       r          e
SFX A   0       n          e
SFX A   0       m          e
SFX A   0       s          e
SFX A   0       e          [^elr]
SFX A   0       er         [^elr]
SFX A   0       en         [^elr]
SFX A   0       em         [^elr]
SFX A   0       es         [^elr]
SFX A   0       e          [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       er         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       en         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       em         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       es         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       e          [^u]er
SFX A   0       er         [^u]er
SFX A   0       en         [^u]er
SFX A   0       em         [^u]er
SFX A   0       es         [^u]er
SFX A   er      re         uer
SFX A   er      rer        uer
SFX A   er      ren        uer
SFX A   er      rem        uer
SFX A   er      res        uer
SFX A   0       e          [eil]el
SFX A   0       er         [eil]el
SFX A   0       en         [eil]el
SFX A   0       em         [eil]el
SFX A   0       es         [eil]el
SFX A   el      le         [^eil]el
SFX A   el      ler        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      len        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      lem        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      les        [^eil]el
SFX A   lig     elig       [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     elige      [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eliger     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eligen     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eligem     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eliges     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   erig    rig        [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rige       [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    riger      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rigen      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rigem      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    riges      [^hi]erig

# special case for ß after short vowel
SFX a Y 5
SFX a   ß       sse       ß
SFX a   ß       ssem       ß
SFX a   ß       ssen       ß
SFX a   ß       sser       ß
SFX a   ß       sses       ß
