dictionaries/de_DE-1901/de_DE-1901.dic
abgepaust/A
absatzfähig/A
Adressat/EPFm
ägyptologisch/A
ähnlich/ACU
Alawit/FP
alternativ/Ake
Amerikaner/FNSm
anempfohlen/A
angegriffen/UA
angeschwärzt/A
angetastet/AU
Anhaltiner/FNS
anschlagen/DIV
antihuman/A
Anweiser/FNSm
arbeitsunwillig/A
asiat/PFozm
athletisch/ACU
aufgeblinkt/A
aufgeräumt/AU
aufgewachsen/A
Aufstocker/FNS
ausgeführt/AU
ausgegossen/A
ausgeschöpft/UA
auskunftspflichtig/A
austräger/FNSozm
badengehen/DIVXW
Baltist/FP
bankrottgefährdet/A
bannen/DIVXY
Bär/FPMm
barmherzig/AU
bauen/BDIVXY
bedeutend/ACU
Bediener/NSFmij
beflissen/AL
befriedigend/ACU
begründet/AU
beharrlich/AC
Bein/EPSTMmij
bekannt/ACLU
belichtet/AU
bequem/ACU
berberfürst/FPozm
berufsregelnd/A
beschränkt/ACU
besorgt/ACU
bestehenbleiben/DIVXW
betreuer/FNSozm
Bett/TMSPmij
Beugungsscheibe/NMm
bewaldet/AU
bewegungsfreudig/A
bewußt/AUC
Bier/EPSMTmij
bieten/DIVXW
Bild/RTMSmij
Bindlacher/FNS
biß/VZ
bizyklisch/A
blaß/ac
blenden/DIVXY
bog/VZ
Bornheimer/FNS
bräche/VZ
branchenfremd/A
brätst/VX
brennen/BDIVX
Breslauer/FNS
Brett/RSTMmij
Brüder/NMm
buchen/BDIVXY
Bürener/FNS
burlesk/A
bürokratisch/AU
Chatter/NSFm
colliehündin/Fozm
dahintergeklemmt/A
dampfen/DIVXY
dauernaß/a
Delbrücker/FNS
denkfaul/A
deutlich/ACU
Diagnostiker/NSFm
dichten/DIVXY
diphasisch/A
distanziert/ACU
dobermannzüchter/FNSozm
doppeln/DIVXY
drehen/BDIVXYW
dreimanualig/A
Dreimeterbrett/STRMm
dribbelkünstler/SNFozm
drosch/VZ
duften/DIVXY
durchgefragt/A
durchstiegen/AU
Ebenholzbrett/STRMm
eichelförmig/A
eidgenosse/NFozm
eigen/AL
eigennützig/ACU
einen/DIVXY
eingepackt/AU
einholbar/AU
Einmeterbrett/STRMm
einsatzrelevant/A
Elmshorner/FNS
elsässisch/A
endlich/AU
Engel/NSMm
Enkel/FNSMmij
entschlußlos/A
entschuldigt/AU
entwickler/NSFozm
erben/DIVXY
erkennungsdienstlich/A
erklärlicherweise/U
ernst/ACL
erreger/NSFozm
erschwinglich/ACU
Esel/FNSMm
eurozentrisch/A
evangelist/PFozm
ewig/AL
fachmännisch/ACU
fagottspieler/FNSozm
fälschen/BDIVXY
familiär/AC
Faß/SMm
fassen/BDIVXY
feind/EFPTSozm
Fenster/NSMmij
Ferkel/NSMm
ferroelektrisch/A
fertigen/DIVXY
Fesselspiel/SEPTMm
Fesselungsspiel/EMPSTm
Feuer/JSMNmij
fiel/VZE
Film/ESTMPmij
fischkundler/FNSozm
flächenbezogen/A
Fleck/STEMm
fliegen/DIVXW
flog/VZ
Fluß/QSMmij
folgen/DIVXY
folgsam/ACU
forscher/FNSozm
fortbestanden/A
frau/MPozm
freundlich/ACU
friedenserzwingend/nA
Friedhofsgärtner/FNSm
fror/VZ
führen/BDIVXY
fünftürig/A
gaffen/DIVXY
Galicier/FNS
gaumeister/NSFozm
gaunerstück/EMPSozm
geachtet/ACU
geächzt/A
gebäckstück/EMPSTozm
geben/DIV
gebogen/AU
gebügelt/AU
gedrosselt/AU
gefährlich/ACU
gefeiert/A
gefragt/AU
geheilt/AU
gehorsam/ACU
geißeltier/EMPSozm
gejubelt/A
gekocht/AU
geküßt/AU
gelb/AL
gelegen/ALU
geleimt/AU
gelöst/AU
gemischtwirtschaftlich/A
genannt/AU
General/EFPSm
geöffnet/AU
geprüft/AU
geräumt/A
gerechterweise/U
germanistikstudent/FPozm
gerührt/AU
geschichte/NMozm
geschichtlich/AU
geschlackt/A
geschminkt/AU
geschwächt/U
gespannt/ACU
gestampft/A
gesühnt/AU
getragen/AU
getreu/AL
gewässert/UA
gewiß/U
gezähnt/AU
gibt/VXW
gießer/NSFozm
ging/EVZ
gläubig/ACU
gleichförmig/AUC
gleichnamig/AU
glömme/VZ
glücksverheißend/AU
goß/VZ
gottkönig/EFPSozm
grämen/DIVXY
graugrünlich/A
griechischprofessor/FPSozm
groschenheft/EPSTMozm
grübe/VZ
gustatorisch/A
Haager/FNS
half/VZ
hältst/VX
hämorrhagisch/A
handlungsstark/AV
Häretiker/FNS
harmonisch/ACU
haschpfeife/NMozm
hätscheln/DIVXY
Hebel/NSMmij
Heidenchrist/PFm
heidenchristlich/A
Heiligenbild/MSTRm
Heim/EMPSTmij
heiraten/DIVXY
herausgekommen/A
Heringsfaß/SMm
Heringsfischer/FNSm
hertreiben/DIVX
heruntergewürgt/A
herz/PMozm
hilft/VXW
hingabefähig/A
Historiograph/FPm
hochfrisiert/A
hollywoodfilm/MEPSTozm
hottepferd/EMPSozm
Huldgöttin/Fm
hüllen/DIVXY
hüpfseil/EMPSozm
hydrogeologisch/A
hygienisch/ACU
ikonograph/FPozm
ingusche/FNozm
insel/NMozm
institutsübergreifend/A
intimpartner/FNSozm
jäger/FNSozm
Jugoslawe/FNm
kabinettstück/EPMSozm
Kaffer/nFNSm
kaltfeucht/A
kam/VZ
kameradschaftlich/ACU
kantonsrichter/FNSozm
kassierer/FNSozm
kater/NSMozm
kennen/DIVX
kern/EPSMozm
keß/ac
Kicker/FNSm
kind/MRTSozm
klargeworden/na
klatschnaß/a
kleid/STJRMozm
kleiden/DIVXY
kleingemustert/nA
Klinkheider/FNS
klitschnaß/a
Klötze/NMm
klug/AU
knoten/DIVXY
kombattant/FPozm
Königsteiner/FNSm
konkreteste/UA
kontextreich/AC
Körper/NSMmij
Korrektor/SPFm
Krabbeltier/EMPSm
kraß/ac
Kreuz/EPTJMmij
kriechen/DIVX
Kringel/NMSm
kroß/ac
kugelsicher/A
kundig/AU
Kupferkessel/NSMm
kupferstecher/NSFozm
kürzen/DIVXY
Kuß/QSMm
laufen/DIVW
laugenartig/A
laut/ACL
Legionär/EPSFm
leichenblaß/a
leiten/DIVXY
Licht/RSMTmij
Lied/MRSTm
liest/V
liftbenutzer/FNSozm
linienförmig/A
lustig/ACU
Madagasse/FNm
magst/VW
Mäntel/MNm
marode/A
Marzipanschwein/EMPSm
Mäzen/EPSFnm
merken/BDIVXYW
merklich/AU
metternichsche/A
ministeriumssprecher/NSFozm
möge/ZV
Möhre/NMm
monophag/A
Moppel/SM
moralisch/ACU
Moselstädter/FNSm
mütter/NMozm
nägel/NMozm
namibier/FNSozm
narren/DIVXY
naß/ac
nassauisch/A
nesseltier/EPSTMozm
neuer/L
nichtmarxistisch/A
Niederkrüchtener/FNS
nötig/ACU
nuß/QMozm
obligatorisch/A
Ökonometriker/NSF
orthodox/AU
Paläontologe/NFm
paratenisch/A
partikel/NSMozm
patschnaß/a
petzen/DIVXY
pfalzgräfin/Fozm
Pferd/EPSTMm
philosophisch/AU
pitschnaß/a
plantagenbesitzer/FNSozm
Platine/NMm
plaudern/DIVXY
plutoniumhaltig/A
praktisch/ACU
printmedienpraktiker/FNSozm
Problem/EPSMmij
protoplanetarisch/A
pudelnaß/a
Pummel/nMNS
pünktlich/ACU
pyromane/NFozm
qualmen/DIVXY
rädertier/EMPSTozm
rechtlich/AU
rechtsstaatswidrig/A
recken/DIVXY
reclamheft/EMPSTozm
refomist/FPozm
regalbrett/STRMozm
regennaß/a
religiös/AU
revoluzzer/FNSozm
riete/VZ
römerzeitlich/A
ruheständler/FNSozm
Ruhmestempel/MNSm
sachgemäß/AU
sah/VZ
Satireheft/EMPSTm
säuft/VX
Schärdinger/FNS
scharfgestellt/A
scheinbar/ACU
Scherz/TEPMm
scheuchen/DIVXY
Schiff/EPSTMm
Schild/EPSTMmij
schiß/VZ
schleppen/DIVXY
Schloß/SrMmij
schlug/VZ
schmolz/VZ
schneenaß/a
schöbe/VZ
Schöpfer/FNSmij
Schränke/NMm
schreckensblaß/a
schrieb/VZE
schußbereit/A
Schüssel/NMm
schweigen/DIVXW
Schwein/EPSTMm
schweißnaß/a
selbständig/ACU
selbstgewiß/a
semiformal/A
Semit/FPm
senden/DIVXY
sickernaß/a
siegesgewiß/a
sinken/DIVX
sinnigerweise/U
Snowboardfahrer/FNSm
spaltenlang/A
spannend/ACU
sperren/BDIVXYW
Spiel/STMEPmij
Spion/EFPSm
spricht/VXW
Stände/NMm
stauchen/BDIVXY
staunaß/a
sterbensmatt/A
stete/AU
Stiefmütter/Mm
stieg/VZ
stierkämpfer/NSFozm
stößt/V
Stück/EPSTMmij
südirisch/A
süß/ACLke
süßen/DIVXY
symmetrisch/AU
Syndikalist/FPm
taunaß/a
terrierhündin/Fozm
Teufel/NSMFm
theatergeschichtlich/A
Tisch/EPSTMmij
todblaß/a
tot/UA
totenblaß/a
trabrennfahrer/FNSozm
tragen/BDIVW
tränennaß/a
Treppe/NMm
treten/DIV
triefnaß/a
tropfnaß/a
tumb/A
Tür/EPMmij
tuschen/DIVXY
überreich/AL
übertroffen/AU
überwinder/NSFozm
umsteigefrei/A
unterbrochen/AU
Väter/NMm
veränderbar/AU
verbrannt/AU
verdrossen/ACU
vererben/BDIOXYL
Verfasser/FNSm
vermeidlich/AU
verschieden/ACL
verwundbar/AU
verzeihlich/AU
Viersener/FNS
vorgelogen/A
vornehm/ACL
wahr/ACLU
Walnuß/QMm
wandeln/DIVXY
warschauer/NSFozm
wartbar/ACU
wechselnaß/a
weggeschafft/A
weisen/DIVX
weiß/ALke
Werkstätte/NMm
wiederverschließbar/A
wildern/DIVXY
Winterthurer/FNS
wissenschaftlich/ACU
wob/VZ
zählen/BDIVXYW
zeiteffizient/AC
Zettel/NSMmij
ziehen/DIVXW
Zipfel/NSFm
zuckern/DIVXY
zukunftsorientiert/A
zureichend/AU
zweistimmig/A
Zwiebel/NMmij
